Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 10. Virginia Port Authority.
§ 62.1-132.20.
Craney Island Disposal Area.

No agency of the Commonwealth, including the Virginia Port Authority, shall have the authority to expand the Craney Island Disposal Area northward or westward. However, the Commonwealth and the Virginia Port Authority are authorized to expend state funds for the construction and development of Craney Island to the east for an additional marine terminal.

The Virginia Port Authority is hereby directed, in coordination with other state and federal agencies, including the United States Army Corps of Engineers, to locate, establish, and use ocean disposal areas for ocean-suitable dredge materials from the Hampton Roads Harbor, or some other suitable site, and to use the existing Craney Island Disposal Area for dredge material suitable or unsuitable for alternate disposal, including ocean disposal, with priority given to materials dredged from the Southern Branch of the Elizabeth River. The construction of a marine terminal on the eastern side of Craney Island Disposal Area using dredge material to extend the disposal area eastward, as defined in the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Feasibility Study approved on October 24, 2006, and authorized by Congress in the Water Resources Development Act of 2007, is hereby authorized.

Prior to the disposal of any dredged material either at an ocean area or on the Craney Island Disposal Area, after the Craney Island Disposal Area has attained its capacity limit, the appropriate state agencies shall investigate and consider the cost and availability of beneficial uses of the dredged material. The appropriate state agencies shall consult with state and federal agencies to ensure the environmental acceptability of any beneficial use. When such environmentally acceptable beneficial use is available and economically feasible, the appropriate state agencies shall pursue such use.For purposes of this section, “Craney Island Disposal Area” means that parcel of land lying and being in the body of water known as Hampton Roads Harbor, within the City of Portsmouth and adjacent to the City of Suffolk.

History.

1991, c. 686; 1998, c. 543; 2009, c. 38; 2013, cc. 762, 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 38, in subsection B, rewrote the last sentence, which read: “An additional marine terminal may, with the consent of the General Assembly and the Governor, be constructed on the eastern side of Craney Island if studies show that it is in the public interest to use dredge material to develop such a facility.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794, are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “or beyond its present capacity or to cause activities which will result in such expansion of the Craney Island Disposal Area. In addition, no state funds shall be expended for any activities which will result in the expansion of Craney Island northward or westward or beyond its present capacity as a disposal area for material dredged from any site, including the Hampton Roads Harbor” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “the construction and development” for “a feasibility study and an environmental impact study related to the potential expansion” in the second sentence.

§§ 62.1-133,
62.1-134.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 589.

Cross references.

For present provisions concerning consolidation of terminal operations, see §

62.1-132.8

.

§ 62.1-134.1.
Expediting shipment of coal.

The Authority shall analyze the shipment of coal through the ports of the Commonwealth for the purpose of expediting such shipments. For this purpose, the Authority shall be authorized to collect, analyze, and require the furnishing of information, which is maintained in the ordinary course of business by the person, firm, or corporation providing such information, pertaining to the transportation of coal which has been moved to and from the ports of this Commonwealth, including:

From a railway company or any subsidiary thereof involved in the shipment or storage of coal — the inland origin; the identity of any transshipper, the rail destination; the route; the car movement record, whether such movement was pursuant to permit or agreement; the date of issuance of permits; the date and time of vessel registration; the position in vessel queue at the time of registration and at the time such vessel was ordered to berth for loading; and date such vessel was loaded;

From any railway company, supplier, mining company, or transshipper — the tonnage and classification of coal loaded aboard such vessel;

From any transshipper — the identity of any supplier, broker, transshipper, or purchaser of coal for shipment by railway;

From any ship line, shipping company, ship agent, wholesaler, retailer, broker, transshipper, or operator of any coal storage facility — the identity of any vessel loaded with coal, the date of such vessel’s arrival at port, the date such vessel departed and the tonnage and classification of coal loaded aboard such vessel; and

From any of the parties mentioned in subdivisions 1, 2, 3, or 4 — any other information which is relevant and necessary to such analysis of shipment of coal through the ports of the Commonwealth provided such information is maintained in the ordinary course of business of such person, firm, or corporation.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, any person, firm, corporation or agent thereof engaged in the mining, consignment, sale, transportation, loading, unloading, storage, or handling of coal for shipment through any port of this Commonwealth, whether as a mining company, railway company, ship line, shipping company, ship agent, wholesaler, retailer, broker, transshipper, operator of any coal storage facility, or facility for the loading or unloading of railroad cars or ships, or any entity otherwise engaged in an activity which directly affects the transportation of coal to or from any port of this Commonwealth, within forty-five days after receiving a written request from the Authority, shall furnish the Authority with any such information as is described in subsection A of this section as is maintained in the ordinary course of business of the party requested to provide the information. In the event of willful noncompliance with the provisions of this section by any person, firm, or corporation, the Authority may petition an appropriate circuit court for injunctive relief or, in the alternative, for recovery of a civil penalty, payable to the Authority, in an amount no less than $100 per day and no more than $1,000 per day for each day noncompliance continues. Upon a finding that the defendant’s noncompliance was willful, the court shall order compliance or payment of the civil penalty, as the case may be.

The aforesaid information and data shall be supplied to the Executive Director of the Authority and shall be for the exclusive use of the Executive Director and the staff of the Authority. Neither the Executive Director nor any staff member of the Authority shall disclose this information and data to any member of the Board of Commissioners of the Authority; nor to any person, firm, corporation or agent thereof engaged in the mining, consignment, sale, transportation, loading, unloading, storage, or handling of coal, whether such person, firm, corporation or agent be public or private and whether or not such person, firm, corporation, or agent be a subsidiary or unit of the Authority; nor to anyone outside the Authority.

In carrying out the functions heretofore described the Authority shall be deemed to be performing essential governmental functions as an agent of the Commonwealth of Virginia.

History.

1981, c. 464.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of proprietary information gathered by or for the Virginia Port Authority as provided in this section from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.6

.

As to personal information systems which are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

.

§ 62.1-135.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 589.

Cross references.

For provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see §§

62.1-132.1

through

62.1-132.19

.

§ 62.1-136.
Power of eminent domain.

The Authority is hereby vested with the power of eminent domain to acquire property or any interest therein, however held, but not property of the Commonwealth or its agencies, and may exercise the same for the purposes set forth in §§

62.1-132.18

and

62.1-132.19

in the manner and to the extent set forth in, and subject to the provisions of, Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1; provided that the Authority shall have no power to condemn any property belonging to any other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or to any common carrier, or public utility or other public service corporation which is being devoted to public use or service. Whether property is being devoted to public use or service in the case of a public service corporation, common carrier, or public utility, shall be decided by the State Corporation Commission in a proceeding under §

25.1-102

; and in the case of a political subdivision shall be decided by the court in which the proceeding is brought.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.8::1; 1962, c. 346; 1968, c. 659; 1981, c. 589; 2003, c. 940.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 substituted “Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1” for “Title 25” in the first sentence, and substituted “§

25.1-102

” for “§ 25-233” in the last sentence.

§ 62.1-137.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 589.

Cross references.

As to the power of the Authority to acquire property, see §

62.1-132.18

.

As to the power of the Authority to acquire and lease property, see §

62.1-132.19

.

§ 62.1-138.
Powers of State Corporation Commission not affected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as affecting the powers and duties now conferred by law upon the State Corporation Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.9; 1952, c. 61; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-139.
Forms of accounts and records; annual report.

The accounts and records of the Authority showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in a form prescribed by governmental generally accepted accounting principles. Such accounts shall correspond as nearly as possible to the accounts and records for such matters maintained by enterprises.

The accounts of the Authority shall be audited annually by a certified public accounting firm selected by the Auditor of Public Accounts with the assistance of the Authority through a process of competitive negotiation. The cost of such audit and review shall be borne by the Authority.

The General Assembly may request the Auditor of Public Accounts to conduct audits at any time.

The Authority shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before November 1 of each year. Such report shall contain the audited annual financial statements of the Authority for the year ending the preceding June 30.

The Authority shall submit a detailed annual operating plan and budget to the Secretary of Transportation and the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget by November 1 of each year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the form and content of the operating plan and budget shall be determined by the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget and shall include information on salaries, expenditures, indebtedness, and other information as determined by the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget.

The Board of Commissioners, the General Assembly, or the Governor may at any time request that the Office of the Inspector General, created pursuant to §

2.2-308

, review any area of the Authority’s finances or operations.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.11; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 146; 2004, c. 650; 2012, cc. 846, 849; 2013, cc. 762, 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 650 deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “The annual report shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of § 2.2-1127.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 846 and 849 are identical, and added the subsection A and D designators and subsections B and C; and in subsection A, substituted “in a form prescribed by governmental generally accepted accounting principles” for “in such form as the Auditor of Public Accounts prescribes” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted “corporate” preceding “enterprises” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and added subsections E and F.

§ 62.1-140.
Definitions; bond resolution; form and requisites of bonds; sale and disposition of proceeds; temporary bonds.

As used in this section and in §§

62.1-141

through

62.1-146

, the term “port facility” means harbors, seaports and all facilities used in connection therewith and shall include all those facilities named in §§

62.1-132.18

and

62.1-132.19

.The term “cost” as used in this chapter embraces the cost of construction, the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements and interests acquired by the Authority for such construction, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the Authority, for one year after completion of construction, engineering and legal expenses, cost of plans, specifications, surveys and estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing any port facility, administrative expense, the creation of a working capital fund for placing the port facility in operation and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the construction of such port facility, the financing of such construction and the placing of the same in operation.The term “bonds” as used in this chapter means obligations of the Authority for the payment of borrowed money. For purposes of the limitations imposed by subsections B and C of §

62.1-140

, contingent obligations to reimburse providers for amounts drawn under credit facilities, letters of credit, lines of credit, guarantees, standby bond purchase agreements, or other credit or liquidity enhancement facilities, including any such enhancement facility obtained by the Authority for deposit into any reserve account or fund relating to any bonds, shall not constitute bonds.For purposes of the limitations imposed by subsections B and C of §

62.1-140

, the term “revenue bonds” means bonds for which only the revenues of port facilities are pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds.

The Authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bonds of the Authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any Authority project for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction or control of port facilities or of any portion or portions thereof, provided that the total principal amount of bonds, including refunding bonds, outstanding at any time shall not exceed $200 million, excluding from such limit any revenue bonds.All of the bonds of one or more series of the bonds of the Authority at any time outstanding may be refunded by the Authority by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the Authority may deem necessary, but not exceeding an amount sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of the bonds so to be refunded, together with all unpaid interest accrued and to accrue and with any redemption premium thereon and all costs and expenses incident to the authorization and issuance of such bonds as determined by the Authority. The proceeds of any such refunding bonds may, in the discretion of the Authority, be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such outstanding revenue bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof, and may, pending such application, be placed in trust in accordance with the provisions of §

62.1-143

of this chapter to be applied to such purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be determined by the Authority. All refunding bonds may have all of the attributes of revenue bonds to the extent that such other provisions of this chapter relating to revenue bonds may be applicable to refunding bonds.

The principal of and the interest on all bonds issued by the Authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at the prevailing rate of interest at the time, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The Authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth.All bonds shall be signed by the Executive Director of the Authority or shall bear his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the Authority or a facsimile thereof shall be impressed or imprinted thereon and attested by the secretary of the Authority, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signature of the Executive Director of the Authority. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the Commonwealth. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The Authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of acquisition, construction, reconstruction and control of port facilities or the portion thereof for which such bonds shall have been issued, or, in the case of refunding bonds, to refund such bonds including any unpaid interest accrued and to accrue and any redemption premium thereon and all costs and expenses incident to the authorization and issuance of such bonds as shall be determined by the Authority upon the issuance of such refunding bonds, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for such bonds, or, if such bonds shall have been issued for paying the cost of a portion of the project, such surplus may be applied to the payment of the cost of any remaining portion of the project.Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.The Authority shall not issue any bonds, other than revenue bonds or any refunding bonds issued by the Authority pursuant to the second paragraph of subsection B of §

62.1-140

, which are not specifically authorized by a bill or resolution passed by a majority vote of those elected to each house of the General Assembly. Refunding bonds may only be issued with the consent of the Governor. However, the Governor, in his sole discretion, may approve bonds which have not been authorized by the General Assembly if such bonds are to finance capital projects that emerge between legislative sessions, provided the debt is required to stimulate commerce consistent with §

62.1-132.3

and provided that:

The total amount of such bonds added to the total amount of Virginia Port Authority bonds currently authorized does not exceed the limit in §

62.1-140

B;

Funds are available within the appropriations, if needed, without adverse effect on other projects or programs, or from unappropriated nongeneral fund revenues or balances;

In the Governor’s opinion such action may result in a measurable benefit to the Commonwealth;

The authorization includes a detailed description of the project, the project need, the total project costs, the estimated operating costs, and the fund sources for the project and its operating costs;

The requirements of Chapter 11.1 (§ 10.1-1182 et seq.), Title 10.1, regarding environmental impact statements, will be met as a precondition for the approval of the project; and

The authorization of any such debt as provided for in this section shall be promptly communicated to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.12; 1954, c. 667; 1958, cc. 174, 488; 1968, c. 659; 1972, c. 423; 1981, cc. 589, 590; 1991, c. 246; 1993, c. 656.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 458 A 6, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

62.1-140

, Code of Virginia, the aggregate principal amount of Commonwealth Port Fund bonds, and including any other long-term commitment that utilizes the Commonwealth Port Fund, shall not exceed $440,000,000.”

§ 62.1-141.
Trust agreement securing bonds; provisions of agreement or bond resolution; depository of proceeds or revenues; expenses.

In the discretion of the Authority any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage the port facilities or any part thereof; provided, however, the Authority may make a purchase-money agreement giving a chattel mortgage or lien on personal property or operating equipment purchased for use in its facilities. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the port facilities or the portion thereof in connection with which such bonds shall have been authorized, the rates to be charged, the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the port facilities or portion thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.13; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659; 1974, c. 148.

§ 62.1-142.
Charges for use of port facilities; sinking fund created from revenues for payment of bonds.

The Authority is hereby authorized to fix and revise charges for the use of the port facilities under its control and the different parts or sections thereof, and to contract with any person, partnership, association or corporation desiring the use of any part thereof, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents and rates of charges for such use. Such charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of charges from the port facility or the portion or portions thereof in connection with which revenue bonds or refunding bonds shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating such port facility or portion or portions and (b) the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes. Such charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau or agency of the Commonwealth or of any municipality, county or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The charges and all other revenues derived from the port facility or portion or portions in connection with which such bonds shall have been issued except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair and operation and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another. In addition to all other powers granted to the Authority by this chapter, the Authority is hereby authorized to pledge to the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds under the provisions of this chapter any moneys received or to be received by it under any appropriation made to it by the General Assembly, unless the appropriation is restricted by the General Assembly to specific purposes of the Authority or such pledge is prohibited by the law making such appropriations; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any such appropriation.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.14; 1954, c. 667; 1958, c. 174; 1968, c. 659; 1981, c. 590.

§ 62.1-143.
Proceeds of bonds and revenues held in trust for certain purposes.

All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds or refunding bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The Authority shall, in the resolution authorizing such bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues to be received to a trustee, which shall be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth, who shall act as trustee of the funds, and hold and apply the same to the purposes of this chapter, subject to such regulations as this chapter and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. In the case of the proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds or revenues, the trustee may invest and reinvest such funds pending their need for the construction of the project in securities that are legal investments under the laws of the Commonwealth for funds held by fiduciaries. In the case of the proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds, the trustee may invest and reinvest such funds in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States of America. Such money and the interest, income and profits, if any, earned on such investment, shall be available for the payment of all or any part of the principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the bonds being refunded. The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be so invested and applied as to assure that the principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds being refunded shall be paid in full on their respective maturity, redemption or interest payment dates. After the terms of the trust have been fully satisfied, and carried out, any balance of such proceeds and interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the Authority for use by it in any lawful manner.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.15; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 1981, c. 590.

§ 62.1-144.
Remedies of bondholders and trustee.

Any holder of bonds, notes, certificates or other evidences of borrowing issued under the provisions of this chapter or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, injunction, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted by this chapter or under such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, notes or certificates and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such agreement or resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer or agent thereof, including the fixing of charges and collection of the same.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.16; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-145.
Exercise of powers constitutes governmental functions; exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter shall be in all respects for the benefit of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce, and for the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, convenience, and prosperity, and as the operation and maintenance of the project by the Authority will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon the project or any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income therefrom, including sales and use taxes on tangible personal property used in and about a marine terminal under the supervision of the Virginia Port Authority for handling cargo, merchandise, freight, and equipment; nor shall the agents, lessees, sublessees, or users of tangible personal property owned by or leased to the Authority be required to pay any sales or use tax upon such property or the revenue derived therefrom; and the bonds, notes, certificates, or other evidences of debt issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income therefrom including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall be exempt from taxation by the Commonwealth and by any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof. The exemption from the retail sales and use tax shall apply to property acquired or used by the Authority, or by a nonstock, nonprofit corporation that operates a marine terminal or terminals solely on behalf of the Authority. Service charge payments to any city, county, or town authorized pursuant to subsection D of §

58.1-3403

shall be paid from the general fund. Service charge payments to any county, city, or town authorized pursuant to subsection B of §

58.1-3403

shall be paid by the Authority.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.17; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659; 1974, c. 546; 1990, c. 694; 2000, c. 737; 2005, c. 581.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 737 added the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 581, added the last sentence.

§ 62.1-146.
Bonds as legal investments.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.18; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-147.
Bonds not debt or pledge of credit of Commonwealth or political subdivision; payment of expenses.

Bonds and refunding bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor from revenues. All such bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the Commonwealth nor the Authority shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues of the port facility and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this chapter and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the Authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.19; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659; 1981, c. 590; 1993, c. 656.

§ 62.1-147.1.
Legalization of prior actions.

Any bonds issued to refund bonds or other obligations of the Authority prior to the adoption of the amendments in this chapter relating to refunding bonds which could now be taken under this chapter are hereby approved, validated and ratified by the legislature of the Commonwealth.

History.

1981, c. 590.

§ 62.1-147.1:1.
Exemption of Authority from certain technology procedures.

The provisions regulating the Virginia Information Technologies Agency (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) shall not apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this chapter.

History.

2013, cc. 762, 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

§ 62.1-147.2.
Chapter liberally construed.

This chapter shall constitute full and complete authority for the doing of the acts and things herein authorized and shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

1997, c. 232.

The number of this section, §

62.1-147.2

,

was assigned by the Code Commission, the number in the enacting legislation having been §

62.1-148

.